Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 5
Filing

§ 28-9-501. Filing office.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if the local law of this state governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or agricultural lien is:

The office designated for the filing or recording of a record of a mortgage on the related real property, if:

the collateral is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut; or

the financing statement is filed as a fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures; or

The office of the secretary of state or any office duly authorized by the secretary of state, in all other cases, including a case in which the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures and the financing statement is not filed as a fixture filing.

The office in which to file a financing statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of a transmitting utility is the office of the secretary of state. The financing statement also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the financing statement which is or is to become a fixture.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-501, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-502. Contents of financing statement — Record of mortgage as financing statement — Time of filing financing statement — Farm products.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a financing statement is sufficient only if it:

Provides the name of the debtor;

Provides the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party; and

Indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-501(b), Idaho Code, to be sufficient, a financing statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to become fixtures, must satisfy subsection (a) of this section and also:

Indicate that it covers this type of collateral;

Indicate that it is to be filed in the real property records;

Provide a description of the real property to which the collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained in a record of the mortgage of the real property; and

If the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real property, provide the name of a record owner.

A record of a mortgage is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if:

The record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;

The goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real property described in the record or the collateral is related to the real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut;

The record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement in this section, but:

the record need not indicate that it is to be filed in the real property records; and

the record sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an individual if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an individual to whom section 28-9-503(a)(4), Idaho Code, applies; and

The record is recorded.

A financing statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a security interest otherwise attaches.

A financing statement covering farm products is sufficient if it:

Contains the names and addresses of both the debtor and the secured party;

Is signed, authorized or otherwise authenticated by the debtor;

Contains the debtor’s social security number or other unique number, combination of numbers and letters, or other identifier selected by the secretary of state using a selection system or method approved by the secretary of agriculture, or in the case of a debtor doing business other than as an individual, the debtor’s internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or other approved unique identifier;

Contains a description by category of the farm products subject to the security interest and the amount of such products, where applicable;
(5) Indicates the county or counties in which the farm products are produced or located.

A financing statement covering farm products must be amended in writing and similarly signed, authorized or authenticated, and filed, to reflect any material changes. In the event such form is not incorporated within the financing statement, the effectiveness and continuation of that form is to be treated as if it were a part of the financing statement with which it is filed.

If the financing statement covering farm products, or an amendment to such statement, is filed electronically, neither the debtor’s nor the secured party’s signature shall be required.

In order to terminate a financing statement covering farm products, the amendment must be terminated in writing and signed or authenticated by the secured party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-502, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2007, ch. 317, § 1, p. 945; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 10, p. 381.

§ 28-9-503. Name of debtor and secured party.

A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered organization’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend or restate the registered organization’s name;

Subject to subsection (f) of this section, if the collateral is being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative;

If the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered organization, only if the financing statement:

provides, as the name of the debtor:

if the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the trust, the name so specified; or

if the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and

if the name is provided in accordance with subparagraph (A)(i) of this paragraph, indicates that the collateral is held in a trust; or

if the name is provided in accordance with subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph, provides additional information sufficient to distinguish the trust from other trusts having one (1) or more of the same settlors or the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the additional information so indicates;

Subject to subsection (g) of this section, if the debtor is an individual to whom this state has issued a driver’s license or an Idaho identification card that has not expired, only if it provides the name of the individual which is indicated on the driver’s license or the Idaho identification card;

If the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) of this subsection does not apply, only if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor; and

In other cases:

if the debtor has a name, only if it provides the organizational name of the debtor; and

if the debtor does not have a name, only if it provides the names of the partners, members, associates or other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.

A financing statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is not rendered ineffective by the absence of:

A trade name or other name of the debtor; or

Unless required under subsection (a)(6)(B) of this section, names of partners, members, associates or other persons comprising the debtor.
(c) A financing statement that provides only the debtor’s trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

(B) in a separate part of the financing statement:

(d) Failure to indicate the representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

(e) A financing statement may provide the name of more than one (1) debtor and the name of more than one (1) secured party.

(f) The name of the decedent indicated on the order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the “name of the decedent” under subsection (a)(2) of this section.

(g) If this state has issued to an individual more than one (1) driver’s license or Idaho identification card of a kind described in subsection (a)(4) of this section, the one that was issued most recently is the one to which subsection (a)(4) of this section refers.

(h) The “name of the settlor or testator” means:

(1) If the settlor is a registered organization, the name of the registered organization indicated on the public organic record filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization; or

(2) In other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated in the trust’s organic record.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-503, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 11, p. 381.

§ 28-9-504. Indication of collateral.

A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if the financing statement provides:

A description of the collateral pursuant to section 28-9-108[, Idaho Code]; or

An indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all personal property.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-504, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-505. Filing and compliance with other statutes and treaties for consignments, leases, other bailments, and other transactions.

A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing statement, or may comply with a statute or treaty described in section 28-9-311(a)[, Idaho Code], using the terms “consignor,” “consignee,” “lessor,” “lessee,” “bailor,” “bailee,” “licensor,” “licensee,” “owner,” “registered owner,” “buyer,” “seller,” or words of similar import, instead of the terms “secured party” and “debtor.”

This part applies to the filing of a financing statement under subsection (a) of this section and, as appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing statement under section 28-9-311(b)[, Idaho Code], but the filing or compliance is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner or buyer which attaches to the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-505, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-506. Effect of errors or omissions.

A financing statement substantially satisfying the requirements of this part is effective, even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with section 28-9-503(a)[, Idaho Code,] is seriously misleading.

If a search of the records of the filing office under the debtor’s correct name, using the filing office’s standard search logic, if any, would disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with section 28-9-503(a)[, Idaho Code], the name provided does not make the financing statement seriously misleading.

For purposes of section 28-9-508(b)[, Idaho Code], the “debtor’s correct name” in subsection (c) of this section means the correct name of the new debtor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-506, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-507. Effect of certain events on effectiveness of financing statement.

A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues, even if the secured party knows of or consents to the disposition.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section and section 28-9-508, Idaho Code, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under section 28-9-506, Idaho Code.

If the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under section 28-9-503(a), Idaho Code, so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under section 28-9-506, Idaho Code:

The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four (4) months after, the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading; and

The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four (4) months after the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement which renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed within four (4) months after that event.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-507, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 12, p. 381.

§ 28-9-508. Effectiveness of financing statement if new debtor becomes bound by security agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a filed financing statement naming an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent that the financing statement would have been effective had the original debtor acquired rights in the collateral.

If the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the new debtor causes a filed financing statement that is effective under subsection (a) of this section to be seriously misleading under section 28-9-506[, Idaho Code]:

The financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four (4) months after, the new debtor becomes bound under section 28-9-203(d)[, Idaho Code]; and

The financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than four (4) months after the new debtor becomes bound under section 28-9-203(d)[, Idaho Code,] unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.

This section does not apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains effective against the new debtor under section 28-9-507(a)[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-508, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-509. Persons entitled to file a record.

A person may file an initial financing statement, amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement, or amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

The debtor authorizes the filing in an authenticated record or pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section; or

The person holds an agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the financing statement covers only collateral in which the person holds an agricultural lien.

By authenticating or becoming bound as debtor by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering:

The collateral described in the security agreement; and

Property that becomes collateral under section 28-9-315(a)(2)[, Idaho Code], whether or not the security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

By acquiring collateral in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues under section 28-9-315(a)(1)[, Idaho Code], a debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under section 28-9-315(a)(2)[, Idaho Code].

A person may file an amendment other than an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; or

The amendment is a termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party of record has failed to file or send a termination statement as required by section 28-9-513(a) or (c)[, Idaho Code], the debtor authorizes the filing, and the termination statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

If there is more than one (1) secured party of record for a financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of an amendment under subsection (d) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-509, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-510. Effectiveness of filed record.

A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under section 28-9-509[, Idaho Code].

A record authorized by one (1) secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

A continuation statement that is not filed within the six (6) month period prescribed by section 28-9-515(d)[, Idaho Code,] is ineffective.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-510, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-511. Secured party of record.

A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has been filed. If an initial financing statement is filed under section 28-9-514(a)[, Idaho Code], the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.

If an amendment of a financing statement which provides the name of a person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the person named in the amendment is a secured party of record. If an amendment is filed under section 28-9-514(b)[, Idaho Code], the assignee named in the amendment is a secured party of record.

A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an amendment of the financing statement which deletes the person.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-511, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-512. Amendment of financing statement.

Subject to section 28-9-509[, Idaho Code], a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to subsection (e) of this section, otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

If the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in section 28-9-501(a)(1)[, Idaho Code], provides the information specified in section 28-9-502(b)[, Idaho Code].

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code], the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

An amendment is ineffective to the extent it:

Purports to delete all debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement; or

Purports to delete all secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-512, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-513. Termination statement.

A secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and:

There is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

To comply with subsection (a) of this section, a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to file the termination statement:

Within one (1) month after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

If earlier, within twenty (20) days after the secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor.

In cases not governed by subsection (a) of this section, within twenty (20) days after a secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the financing statement or file the termination statement in the filing office if:

Except in the case of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value;

The financing statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation;

The financing statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but are not in the debtor’s possession; or

The debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-510[, Idaho Code], upon the filing of a termination statement with the filing office, the financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective. Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-510[, Idaho Code], for purposes of sections 28-9-519(g), 28-9-522(a) and 28-9-523(c)[, Idaho Code], the filing with the filing office of a termination statement relating to a financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility also causes the effectiveness of the financing statement to lapse.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-513, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-514. Assignment of powers of secured party of record.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, an initial financing statement may reflect an assignment of all of the secured party’s power to authorize an amendment to the financing statement by providing the name and mailing address of the assignee as the name and address of the secured party.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a secured party of record may assign of record all or part of its power to authorize an amendment to a financing statement by filing in the filing office an amendment of the financing statement which:

Identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates;

Provides the name of the assignor; and

Provides the name and mailing address of the assignee.

An assignment of record of a security interest in a fixture covered by a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under section 28-9-502(c)[, Idaho Code,] may be made only by an assignment of record of the mortgage in the manner provided by law of this state other than the uniform commercial code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-514, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-515. Duration and effectiveness of financing statement — Effect of lapsed financing statement.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-705(g), Idaho Code, and subsections (b), (e), (f) and (g) of this section, a filed financing statement is effective for a period of five (5) years after the date of filing.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e), (f) and (g) of this section, an initial financing statement filed in connection with a public finance transaction or manufactured home transaction is effective for a period of thirty (30) years after the date of filing if it indicates that it is filed in connection with a public finance transaction or manufactured home transaction.

The effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration of the period of its effectiveness unless before the lapse a continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective and any security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by the financing statement becomes unperfected, unless the security interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-705(g), Idaho Code, a continuation statement may be filed only within six (6) months before the expiration of the five (5) year period specified in subsection (a) of this section or the thirty (30) year period specified in subsection (b) of this section, whichever is applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 28-9-510 and 28-9-705(g), Idaho Code, upon timely filing of a continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing statement continues for a period of five (5) years commencing on the day on which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the absence of the filing. Upon the expiration of the five (5) year period, the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in subsection (c) of this section, unless, before the lapse, another continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial financing statement.

If a debtor is a transmitting utility and a filed initial financing statement so indicates, the financing statement is effective until a termination statement is filed.

A record of a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under section 28-9-502(c), Idaho Code, remains effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real property.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-515, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2002, ch. 107, § 4, p. 290; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 13, p. 381.

§ 28-9-516. What constitutes filing — Effectiveness of filing.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.

Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because:

The record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office;

An amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered;

The filing office is unable to index the record because:

in the case of an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;

in the case of an amendment or information statement, the record:

does not identify the initial financing statement as required by section 28-9-512 or 28-9-518, Idaho Code, as applicable; or

identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under section 28-9-515, Idaho Code;

In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;

In the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, except for financing statements covering farm products and amendments of such financing statements, the record does not:

provide a mailing address for the debtor; or

indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization;

In the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under section 28-9-514(a), Idaho Code, or an amendment filed under section 28-9-514(b), Idaho Code, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee;

In the case of a continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six (6) month period prescribed by section 28-9-515(d), Idaho Code;

In the case of a financing statement covering farm products, the financing statement does not contain all of the information specified in section 28-9-502(e), Idaho Code, and does not conform to the official form for farm products financing statements published by the secretary of state; or

In the case of an amendment or correction statement relating to a financing statement covering farm products, the amendment or correction statement does not conform to the official form for amendment or correction statements relating to financing statements covering farm products published by the secretary of state.

The filing office is prohibited from accepting the filing pursuant to the provisions of section 28-9-516A, Idaho Code.

For purposes of subsection (b) of this section:

A record does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information; and

A record that does not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as required by section 28-9-512, 28-9-514 or 28-9-518, Idaho Code, is an initial financing statement.

A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in subsection (b) of this section, is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.

(C) in the case of an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor’s surname; or

(D) in the case of a record filed, or recorded, in the filing office described in section 28-9-501(a)(1), Idaho Code, the record does not provide a sufficient description of the real property to which it relates;

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-516, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 304, § 1, p. 852; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 14, p. 381.

§ 28-9-516A. Filing officer duties. — (1) The filing officer shall not file an initial financing statement or financing statement amendment:

Which contains an assumed business name for either an individual or a business entity other than a general partnership if the assumed business name is designated as an assumed business name and the true name of the person using the assumed business name is not included.

When an individual debtor and an individual secured party would, as a result of the filing, appear to be the same individual on the financing statement.

(2) The filing officer may require, prior to filing, reasonable proof from the secured party that an individual debtor is in fact a “transmitting utility” as defined in section 28-9-102, Idaho Code, if a filing indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility.

(3) The filing officer may, prior to filing, cause to be unreadable any signatures, social security account numbers, taxpayer identification numbers, and employer identification numbers that appear on financing statements or financing statement amendments.

(4) The secretary of state may petition the district court in Ada county for an order to show cause why filings not in compliance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section should not be deleted from the files and records of the secretary of state.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-516A, as added by 2003, ch. 206, § 1, p. 549; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 15, p. 381.

§ 28-9-517. Effect of indexing errors.

The failure of the filing office to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-517, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-518. Claim concerning inaccurate or wrongfully filed record.

A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record indexed there under the person’s name if the person believes that the record is inaccurate or was wrongfully filed.

An information statement under subsection (a) of this section must:

Identify the record to which it relates by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates;

Indicate that it is an information statement; and

Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record is inaccurate and indicate the manner in which the person believes the record should be amended to cure any inaccuracy or provide the basis for the person’s belief that the record was wrongfully filed.

A person may file in the filing office an information statement with respect to a record filed there if the person is a secured party of record with respect to the financing statement to which the record relates and believes that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under section 28-9-509(d), Idaho Code.

An information statement under subsection (c) of this section must:

Identify the record to which it relates by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates;

Indicate that it is an information statement; and

Provide the basis for the person’s belief that the person that filed the record was not entitled to do so under section 28-9-509(d), Idaho Code.

The filing of an information statement does not affect the effectiveness of an initial financing statement or other filed record.

An information statement may be filed in connection with the previous filing of a financing statement covering farm products under section 28-9-502, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-518, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2007, ch. 317, § 2, p. 945; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 16, p. 381.

Section 22 of S.L. 2012, ch 145 provided that the act should take effect on and after July 1, 2013.
Official Comment

§ 28-9-519. Numbering, maintaining, and indexing records — Communicating information provided in records.

For each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall:

Assign a unique number to the filed record;

Create a record that bears the number assigned to the filed record and the date and time of filing;

Maintain the filed record for public inspection; and

Index the filed record in accordance with subsections (c), (d) and (e) of this section.

A file number assigned after January 1, 2002, must include a digit that:

Is mathematically derived from or related to the other digits of the file number; and

Aids the filing office in determining whether a number communicated as the file number includes a single digit or transpositional error.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the filing office shall:

Index an initial financing statement according to the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing statement; and

Index a record that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, it must be filed for record and the filing office shall index it:

Under the names of the debtor and of each owner of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under a mortgage of the real property described; and

To the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing of records of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement were a record of a mortgage of the real property described.

If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the filing office shall index an assignment filed under section 28-9-514(a)[, Idaho Code,] or an amendment filed under section 28-9-514(b)[, Idaho Code]:

Under the name of the assignor as grantor; and

To the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage under the name of the assignee, under the name of the assignee.

The filing office shall maintain a capability:

To retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

To associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

The filing office may not remove a debtor’s name from the index until one (1) year after the effectiveness of a financing statement naming the debtor lapses under section 28-9-515[, Idaho Code,] with respect to all secured parties of record.
(h) The filing office shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) through (e) of this section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office rule, but not later than two (2) business days after the filing office receives the record in question.

Subsections (b) and (h) of this section do not apply to a filing office described in section 28-9-501(a)(1)[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-519, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.